New York, session 2025-2026, A430.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph 12-b of subsection (i) of section 3216 of the 2 insurance law, as added by a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the 3 insurance law relating to providing health insurance coverage for scalp 4 cooling systems for the preservation of hair during cancer chemotherapy 5 treatment, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 2063-A and A. 6 38-A, is REPEALED. 7 § 2. Subparagraph (A) of paragraph (12-b) of subsection (l) of section 8 3221 of the insurance law, as added by a chapter of the laws of 2024 9 amending the insurance law relating to providing health insurance cover- 10 age for scalp cooling systems for the preservation of hair during cancer 11 chemotherapy treatment, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 12 2063-A and A. 38-A, is amended to read as follows: 13 (A) Every large group policy delivered or issued for delivery in this 14 state that provides medical, major medical, or similar comprehensive- 15 type coverage and provides coverage cancer chemotherapy treatment shall 16 provide coverage for scalp cooling systems used in connection with 17 cancer chemotherapy treatment. Coverage provided under this paragraph EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02929-01-5 A. 430 2 1 may be subject to annual deductibles and coinsurance, including copay- 2 ments, as may be deemed appropriate by the superintendent and as are 3 consistent with those established for other benefits within a given 4 policy. 5 § 3. Paragraph (1) of subsection (q-2) of section 4303 of the insur- 6 ance law, as added by a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the insur- 7 ance law relating to providing health insurance coverage for scalp cool- 8 ing systems for the preservation of hair during cancer chemotherapy 9 treatment, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 2063-A and A. 10 38-A, is amended to read as follows: 11 (1) Every [policy] large group contract delivered or issued for deliv- 12 ery in this state that provides medical, major medical, or similar 13 comprehensive-type coverage and provides coverage for cancer chemothera- 14 py treatment shall provide coverage for scalp cooling systems used in 15 connection with cancer chemotherapy treatment. Coverage provided under 16 this subsection may be subject to annual deductibles and coinsurance, 17 including copayments, as may be deemed appropriate by the superintendent 18 and as are consistent with those established for other benefits with- 19 in a given [policy] contract. 20 § 4. Section 4 of a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the insurance 21 law relating to providing health insurance coverage for scalp cooling 22 systems for the preservation of hair during cancer chemotherapy treat- 23 ment, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 2063-A and A. 38-A, is 24 amended to read as follows: 25 § 4. This act shall take effect January 1, 2026 and shall apply to any 26 large group policy or contract issued, renewed, modified, altered, or 27 amended on or after such date. 28 § 5. This act shall take effect on the same date and in the same 29 manner as a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the insurance law 30 relating to providing health insurance coverage for scalp cooling 31 systems for the preservation of hair during cancer chemotherapy treat- 32 ment, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 2063-A and A. 38-A, 33 takes effect.